District of Columbia statutes.
50-704.01

Report by Mayor.

The Mayor, on or before March 1 of each year, shall submit to the Council a report detailing the following:

(a)

The total number of alternative-fuel vehicles purchased by the District in the previous fiscal year, by agency;

(b)

The total number of alternative-fuel vehicles owned by the District, by agency;

(c)

The total number of vehicles owned by the District, by agency;

(d)

The percentage of alternative-fuel vehicles, by agency;

(e)

A plan to purchase additional alternative-fuel vehicles in the upcoming fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years; and

(f)

A plan to comply with the purchase requirements mandated by this chapter.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 5a
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(e), 41 DCR 7178
1981 Ed., § 40-2004.1.